District of Columbia statutes.
28-3502

Special promise to answer for debt or default of another.

An action may not be brought to charge an executor or administrator upon a special promise to answer damages out of his own estate, or to charge the defendant upon a special promise to answer for the debt, default, or miscarriage of another person, or to charge a person upon an agreement made upon consideration of marriage, or upon a contract or sale of real estate, of any interest in or concerning it, or upon an agreement that is not to be performed within one year from the making thereof, unless the agreement upon which the action is brought, or a memorandum or note thereof, is in writing, which need not state the consideration and signed by the party to be charged therewith or a person authorized by him.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 676, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1973 Ed., § 28-3502.
1981 Ed., § 28-3502.